Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 222

Membership Meetings

48-222-101. Meetings of members.

Frequency — Member-Managed. Unless the LLC has elected in its articles to be board-managed, meetings of members may but need not be held unless required by the articles or operating agreement. Unless otherwise provided by the articles, operating agreement or by chapters 201-248 of this title, no particular business is required to be transacted at a meeting, and any business appropriate for action by the members may be transacted at any meeting.

Frequency — Board-Managed. If the LLC has elected in its articles to be board-managed, unless the articles or operating agreement provide for more frequent meetings, there shall be an annual meeting of the members. At such annual meeting, the governors shall be elected and any other proper business may be conducted.

Demand for Meeting. Unless otherwise provided by the articles or operating agreement, a meeting of the members of an LLC may be called by any one (1) or more of the following persons:

The chief manager, the secretary or any member; or

If the LLC is board-managed, in addition to those persons in subdivision (c)(1), a meeting of the members of the LLC may be called by any governor of the LLC.

Calling of Meeting.

The person having the authority to call a meeting under subsection (c) may call the meeting by:

Giving written notice of demand to the members in accordance with § 48-222-102; or

Giving written notice of demand to the secretary of the LLC who shall give such notice to the members, in accordance with § 48-222-102, at the expense of the LLC, within seven (7) days after receipt of the demand.

If the secretary fails to cause a meeting to be called and held as required by this subsection (d), the person making that demand may call the meeting by giving notice as required by § 48-222-102, all at the expense of the LLC. In any case, the notice of a meeting of members must be given no fewer than ten (10) days nor more than two (2) months before the meeting date.

Time and Place. Meetings must be held on the date and at the time and place fixed by the person authorized by chapters 201-248 of this title or by the articles or operating agreement to call a meeting, except that a meeting called by or at the demand of any member pursuant to subsection (c) must be held in the county in which the principal executive office is located or, if there is no principal executive office, in the county in which the registered office is located unless the articles or operating agreement provide for a specific county, in or out of the state, in which such meeting must be held. A meeting by electronic conference will be deemed to be held at the principal executive office or registered office, as required by chapters 201-248 of this title or at the place properly named in the notice calling the meeting.

Business Limited. Except for the annual meeting required in subsection (b) for a board-managed LLC, or as otherwise provided in the articles or operating agreement, the business transacted at a meeting is limited to the purposes stated in the notice of the meeting.

Validity of Actions. The failure for any reason to hold any regularly scheduled meeting on the date stated in the articles or operating agreement does not affect the validity of any action taken by the LLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 31.

48-222-102. Notice.

To Whom Given. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or in the articles, written notice of all meetings of members must be given to every member entitled to vote on the matters to be considered, unless:

The meeting is an adjourned meeting and the date, time, and place of the meeting were announced at the time of adjournment; or

The following have been mailed by first class, certified or registered mail to a member at the address in the LLC records and returned undeliverable:

Two (2) consecutive meeting notices; and

All payments of distributions for the greater of a twelve-month period or two (2) distributions;

An action or meeting that is taken or held without notice under this subdivision (a)(2) has the same force and effect as if notice was given. If the member delivers a written notice of the member's current address to the LLC, the notice requirement is reinstated;

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or operating agreement, the record date for the determination of the owners of membership interests entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of members is the close of business on the date before the first notice is sent to the members.

Contents. The notice must contain the date, time, and place of the meeting, and any other information required by this chapter. In the case of a meeting, other than the required annual meeting of a board-managed LLC, the notice must contain a statement of the purposes of the meeting. The notice may also contain any other information required by the articles or operating agreement or considered necessary or desirable by the person or persons calling the meeting.

Prima Facie Evidence of Notice. A certificate of the secretary or other person giving the notice that the notice required by this section has been given, in the absence of fraud, shall be prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein.

Waiver and Objections. A member may waive any notice required by this chapter. Except as otherwise provided herein, a waiver of notice by a member entitled to notice is effective, whether given before or after the meeting or other balloting, if such notice is given in writing. If a written waiver is given, the secretary shall place such written waiver in the records of the LLC. Attendance by a member at a meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting, except where the member objects at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened, or objects before a vote on an item of business because the item may not lawfully be considered at that meeting and does not participate in the consideration of the item at that meeting. The secretary is required to note the objection in the minutes of the meeting.

Required Notice to Members.

Notwithstanding provisions in the articles or operating agreement to the contrary, all members and parties to contribution agreements and/or contribution allowance agreements shall be entitled to receive notices of the annual meetings of the members of a board-managed LLC and notices of all meetings of an LLC called for the purpose of considering any of the following actions:

Dissolution;

Liquidation;

Sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the LLC outside the ordinary course of business; or

Merger.

The failure of the LLC to properly notify the parties not entitled to vote on a matter shall not invalidate or void any action described above taken at such meeting.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 32.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

48-222-103. Electronic communications.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or operating agreement, a conference among members (or governors, if any) by any means of communication through which the participants may simultaneously hear each other during the conference constitutes attendance at the meeting in person or by proxy if all the other requirements for a meeting of this chapter are met.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 33.